District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0751.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Health and Human Service Programs and Benefits Eligibility and
Delivery Data-Sharing Clarifications Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Homeless Services Reform Act of 2005, effective October 22, 2005 (D.C.
Law 16-35; D.C. Official Code § 4-751.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 9(a)(7) (D.C. Official Code § 4-754.11(a)(7)) is amended by striking the
phrase “consistent with the confidentiality requirements of District and federal law;” and
inserting the phrase “consistent with the confidentiality requirements of District and federal law,
subject to the authorized uses and mandatory disclosures of such records and information in
accordance with Title I of the Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Amendment Act of
2010, effective December 4, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-273; D.C. Official Code § 7-241 et seq.);” in its
place.
(b) Section 12(12) (D.C. Official Code § 4-754.21(12)) is amended by striking the phrase
“consistent with the confidentiality requirements of District and federal law;” and inserting the
phrase “consistent with the confidentiality requirements of District and federal law, subject to the
authorized uses and mandatory disclosures of such records and information in accordance with
Title I of the Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Amendment Act of 2010, effective
December 4, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-273; D.C. Official Code § 7-241 et seq.);” in its place.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 3. Title I of the Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Amendment Act of
2010, effective December 4, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-273; D.C. Official Code § 7-241 et seq.), is
amended as follows:
(a) Section 101(1) (D.C. Official Code § 7-241(1)) is amended by striking the period and
inserting the phrase “, or any subdivision of such agency, department, unit, authority, or
instrumentality.” in its place.
(b) The lead-in language of section 102(a) (D.C. Official Code § 7-242(a)) is amended by
striking the phrase “In accordance with section 103 and without” and insert the word “Without”
in its place.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2